Maine, session 132, LD623.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 22 MRSA §3088-A, as enacted by PL 2019, c. 488, §1, is amended to read:
§3088-A. Support for underserved populations
Within the limits of its available resources, the department may enter into contracts
with dedicated brain injury organizations based in the State or with brain injury
organizations representing individuals with a brain injury and their families, bringing
together with an affiliate in the State established and directed by families, caregivers and
individuals with an acquired brain injury residing in the State, to collaborate with the
department on federal brain injury state partnership grants and bring together state and
national expertise to provide core brain injury support for underserved populations of
individuals with an acquired brain injury, including, but not limited to, individuals who
experienced an opioid drug overdose resulting in anoxic or hypoxic brain injury, who are
veterans, who are victims of domestic violence, who are experiencing homelessness, who
are ineligible for MaineCare and who have a newly acquired brain injury. For the purposes
of this section, "core brain injury support" includes, but is not limited to, resource
facilitation, brain injury support groups, outreach designed for individuals who have a
newly acquired brain injury, access to a joint state and national helpline, access to an online
brain injury screening and support system, information and resource education and family
caregiver training. The department may adopt rules to implement this section. Rules
adopted pursuant to this section are routine technical rules as defined in Title 5, chapter
375, subchapter 2‑A.
Page 1 - 132LR1749(03)